Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB552.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 224.1-010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Air contaminant" includes smoke, dust, soot, grime, carbon, or any other
particulate matter, radioactive matter, noxious acids, fumes, gases, odor, vapor, or
any combination thereof;
(2) "Air contaminant source" means any and all sources of emission of air
contaminants, whether privately or publicly owned or operated. Without limiting
the generality of the foregoing, this term includes all types of business, commercial
and industrial plants, works, shops, and stores, and heating and power plants and
stations, buildings and other structures of all types, including single and multiple
family residences, apartments, houses, office buildings, public buildings, hotels,
restaurants, schools, hospitals, churches, and other institutional buildings,
automobiles, trucks, tractors, buses and other motor vehicles, garages and vending
and service locations and stations, railroad locomotives, ships, boats and other
waterborne craft, portable fuel-burning equipment, incinerators of all types (indoor
and outdoor), refuse dumps and piles, and all stack and other chimney outlets from
any of the foregoing;
(3) "Air pollution" means the presence in the outdoor atmosphere of one (1) or more air
contaminants in sufficient quantities and of such characteristics and duration as is or
threatens to be injurious to human, plant, or animal life, or to property, or which
unreasonably interferes with the comfortable enjoyment of life or property;
(4) "Closure" means the time at which a waste treatment, storage, or disposal facility
permanently ceases to accept wastes, and includes those actions taken by the owner
or operator of the facility to prepare the site for post-closure monitoring and
maintenance or to make it suitable for other uses;
Page 1 of 13
XXXX 2/3/2026 9:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1097
(5) "Compost" means solid waste which has undergone biological decomposition of
organic matter, been disinfected using composting or similar technologies, been
stabilized to a degree which is potentially beneficial to plant growth and which is
approved for use or sale as a soil amendment, artificial topsoil, growing medium
amendment, or other similar uses;
(6) "Composting" means the process by which biological decomposition of organic
solid waste is carried out under controlled aerobic conditions, and which stabilizes
the organic fraction into a material which can easily and safely be stored, handled,
and used in an environmentally acceptable manner:
(a) "Composting" may include a process which creates an anaerobic zone within
the composting material;
(b) "Composting" does not include simple exposure of solid waste under
uncontrolled conditions resulting in natural decay;
(7) "Demonstration" means the initial exhibition of a new technology, process or
practice or a significantly new combination or use of technologies, processes or
practices, subsequent to the development stage, for the purpose of proving
technological feasibility and cost effectiveness;
(8) "Cabinet" means the Energy and Environment Cabinet;
(9) "Disposal" means the discharge, deposit, injection, dumping, spilling, leaking, or
placing of any waste into or on any land or water so that such waste or any
constituent thereof may enter the environment or be emitted into the air or
discharged into any waters, including ground waters;
(10) "District" means an air pollution control district as provided for in KRS Chapter 77;
(11) "Effluent limitations" means any restrictions or prohibitions established under state
law which include, but are not limited to, effluent limitations, standards of
performance for new sources, and toxic effluent standards on quantities, rates, and
concentrations of chemical, physical, biological, and other constituents which are
Page 2 of 13
XXXX 2/3/2026 9:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1097
discharged into waters;
(12) "Generator" means any person, by site, whose act or process produces waste;
(13) "Materials recovery facility" means a solid waste management facility that provides
for the extraction from solid waste of recyclable materials, materials suitable for use
as a fuel or soil amendment, or any combination of those materials;
(14) "Municipal solid waste disposal facility" means any type of waste site or facility
where the final deposition of any amount of municipal solid waste occurs, whether
or not mixed with or including other waste allowed under Subtitle D of the Federal
Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, as amended, and includes but is
not limited to incinerators and waste-to-energy facilities that burn municipal solid
waste and contained and residential landfills, but does not include an advanced
recycling facility or a waste site or facility which is operated exclusively by a solid
waste generator on property owned by the solid waste generator which accepts only
industrial solid waste from the solid waste generator or industrial solid waste
generated at another facility owned and operated by the generator or wholly-owned
subsidiary, or a medical waste incinerator which is owned, operated, and located on
the property of a hospital or university which is regulated by the cabinet and used
for the purpose of treatment, prior to landfill, of medical waste received from the
generator exclusively or in combination with medical waste generated by
professionals or facilities licensed or regulated or operated by the Commonwealth;
(15) "Municipal solid waste reduction" means source reduction, waste minimization,
reuse, recycling, composting, and materials recovery;
(16) "Person" means an individual, trust, firm, joint stock company, corporation
(including a government corporation), partnership, association, federal agency, state
agency, city, commission, political subdivision of the Commonwealth, or any
interstate body;
(17) "Post-closure monitoring and maintenance" means the routine care, maintenance,
Page 3 of 13
XXXX 2/3/2026 9:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1097
and monitoring of a solid waste or hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal
facility following closure of the facility;
(18) "Publicly owned treatment works" means any device or system used in the
treatment (including recycling and recovery) of municipal sewage or industrial
wastes of a liquid nature which is owned by the Commonwealth or a political
subdivision of the Commonwealth;
(19) "Recovered material" means those materials, including but not limited to compost,
which have known current use, reuse, or recycling potential, which can be feasibly
used, reused, or recycled, and which have been diverted or removed from the solid
waste stream for sale, use, reuse, or recycling, whether or not requiring subsequent
separation and processing, but does not include materials diverted or removed for
purposes of energy recovery or combustion except refuse-derived fuel (RDF),
which shall be credited as a recovered material in an amount equal to that
percentage of the municipal solid waste received on a daily basis at the processing
facility and processed into RDF; but not to exceed fifteen percent (15%) of the total
amount of the municipal solid waste received at the processing facility on a daily
basis. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, tire-derived fuel, as
defined in subsection (53) of this section, shall be considered a recovered material;
(20) "Recovered material processing facility" means a facility engaged solely in the
storage, processing, and resale or reuse of recovered material, but does not mean a
solid waste management facility if solid waste generated by a recovered material
processing facility is managed pursuant to this chapter and administrative
regulations adopted by the cabinet;
(21) "Recycling" means any process by which materials which would otherwise become
solid waste are collected, separated, or processed and reused or returned to use in
the form of raw materials or products, including refuse-derived fuel when processed
in accordance with administrative regulations established by the cabinet, but does
Page 4 of 13
XXXX 2/3/2026 9:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1097
not include the incineration or combustion of materials for the recovery of energy;
(22) "Refuse-derived fuel" means a sized, processed fuel product derived from the
extensive separation of municipal solid waste, which includes the extraction of
recoverable materials for recycling and the removal of nonprocessables such as dirt
and gravel prior to processing the balance of the municipal solid waste into the
refuse-derived fuel product;
(23) "Secretary" means the secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet;
(24) "Sewage system" means individually or collectively those constructions or devices
used for collecting, pumping, treating, and disposing of liquid or waterborne
sewage, industrial wastes, or other wastes;
(25) "Termination" means the final actions taken by the cabinet as to a solid waste or
hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facility when formal responsibilities
for post-closure monitoring and maintenance cease;
(26) "Waste site or facility" means any place where waste is managed, processed, or
disposed of by incineration, landfilling, or any other method, but does not include a
container located on property where solid waste is generated and which is used
solely for the purpose of collection and temporary storage of that solid waste prior
to off-site disposal, or a recovered material processing facility, or an advanced
recycling facility, or the combustion of processed waste in a utility boiler;
(27) "Storage" means the containment of wastes, either on a temporary basis or for a
period of years, in such a manner as not to constitute disposal of such wastes;
(28) "Transportation" means any off-site movement of waste by any mode, and any
loading, unloading, or storage incidental thereto;
(29) "Treatment" means any method, technique, or process, including neutralization,
designed to change the physical, chemical, or biological character or composition of
any waste so as to neutralize such waste or so as to render such waste
nonhazardous, safer for transport, amenable for recovery, amenable for storage, or
Page 5 of 13
XXXX 2/3/2026 9:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1097
reduced in volume. Such term includes any activity or processing designed to
change the physical form or chemical composition of hazardous waste so as to
render it nonhazardous;
(30) "Waste" means:
(a) "Solid waste" means any garbage, refuse, sludge, and other discarded
material, including solid, liquid, semi-solid, or contained gaseous material
resulting from industrial, commercial, mining (excluding coal mining wastes,
coal mining by-products, refuse, and overburden), agricultural operations, and
from community activities, but does not include those materials including, but
not limited to, sand, soil, rock, gravel, or bridge debris extracted as part of a
public road construction project funded wholly or in part with state funds,
recovered material, post-use polymers or recovered feedstocks, tire-derived
fuel, special wastes as designated by KRS 224.50-760, solid or dissolved
material in domestic sewage, manure, crops, crop residue, or a combination
thereof which are placed on the soil for return to the soil as fertilizers or soil
conditioners, or solid or dissolved material in irrigation return flows or
industrial discharges which are point sources subject to permits under Section
402 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended (86 Stat. 880), or
source, special nuclear, or by-product material as defined by the Atomic
Energy Act of 1954, as amended (68 Stat. 923):
1. "Household solid waste" means solid waste, including garbage and trash
generated by single and multiple family residences, hotels, motels,
bunkhouses, ranger stations, crew quarters, and recreational areas such
as picnic areas, parks, and campgrounds, but it does not include tire-
derived fuel;
2. "Commercial solid waste" means all types of solid waste generated by
stores, offices, restaurants, warehouses, and other service and
Page 6 of 13
XXXX 2/3/2026 9:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1097
nonmanufacturing activities, excluding tire-derived fuel and household
and industrial solid waste;
3. "Industrial solid waste" means solid waste generated by manufacturing
or industrial processes that is not a hazardous waste or a special waste as
designated by KRS 224.50-760, including but not limited to waste
resulting from the following manufacturing processes: electric power
generation; fertilizer or agricultural chemicals; food and related products
or by-products; inorganic chemicals; iron and steel manufacturing;
leather and leather products; nonferrous metals
manufacturing/foundries; organic chemicals; plastics and resins
manufacturing; pulp and paper industry; rubber and miscellaneous
plastic products, except tire-derived fuel; stone, glass, clay, and concrete
products; textile manufacturing; transportation equipment; and water
treatment; and
4. "Municipal solid waste" means household solid waste and commercial
solid waste; and
(b) "Hazardous waste" means any discarded material or material intended to be
discarded or substance or combination of such substances intended to be
discarded, in any form which because of its quantity, concentration or
physical, chemical or infectious characteristics may cause, or significantly
contribute to an increase in mortality or an increase in serious irreversible, or
incapacitating reversible, illness or pose a substantial present or potential
hazard to human health or the environment when improperly treated, stored,
transported, or disposed of, or otherwise managed;
(31) "Waste management district" means any county or group of counties electing to
form under the provisions of KRS Chapter 109 and operate in conformance with the
provisions of KRS Chapter 109 and with Section 4006, Resource Conservation and
Page 7 of 13
XXXX 2/3/2026 9:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1097
Recovery Act of 1976, as amended (Public Law 94-580);
(32) "Water" or "waters of the Commonwealth" means and includes any and all rivers,
streams, creeks, lakes, ponds, impounding reservoirs, springs, wells, marshes, and
all other bodies of surface or underground water, natural or artificial,[:
(a) Navigable waters, as defined in 33 U.S.C. sec. 1362;
(b) Sinkholes with open throat drains;
(c) Naturally occurring artesian or phreatic springs, as well as any other spring used as
a source of domestic water supply; and
(d) Wellhead protection areas;
] that are situated wholly or partly within or bordering upon the Commonwealth or
within its jurisdiction;
(33) "Water pollution" means the alteration of the physical, thermal, chemical,
biological, or radioactive properties of the waters of the Commonwealth in such a
manner, condition, or quantity that will be detrimental to the public health or
welfare, to animal or aquatic life or marine life, to the use of such waters as present
or future sources of public water supply or to the use of such waters for
recreational, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other legitimate purposes;
(34) "Pollutant" means and includes dredged spoil, solid waste, incinerator residue,
sewage, sewage sludge, garbage, chemical, biological or radioactive materials, heat,
wrecked or discarded equipment, rock, sand, soil, industrial, municipal or
agricultural waste, and any substance resulting from the development, processing,
or recovery of any natural resource which may be discharged into water;
(35) "NPDES" means National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System;
(36) "Manifest" means the form used for identifying the quantity, composition, and the
origin, routing, and destination of waste during its transportation from the point of
generation to the point of disposal, treatment, or storage;
(37) "Open dump" means any facility or site for the disposal of solid waste which does
Page 8 of 13
XXXX 2/3/2026 9:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1097
not have a valid permit issued by the cabinet or does not meet the environmental
performance standards established under regulations promulgated by the cabinet;
(38) "Solid waste management" means the administration of solid waste activities:
collection, storage, transportation, transfer, processing, treatment, and disposal,
which shall be in accordance with a cabinet-approved county or multicounty solid
waste management plan;
(39) "Solid waste management area" or "area" means any geographical area established
or designated by the cabinet in accordance with the provisions of this chapter;
(40) "Solid waste management facility" means any facility for collection, storage,
transportation, transfer, processing, treatment, or disposal of solid waste, whether
such facility is associated with facilities generating such wastes or otherwise, but
does not include a container located on property where solid waste is generated and
which is used solely for the purpose of collection and temporary storage of that
solid waste prior to off-site disposal, or a recovered material processing facility or
advanced recycling facility, both of which are otherwise subject to regulation
pursuant to this chapter for control of environmental impacts and to prevent any
public nuisance;
(41) "Hazardous constituent" shall conform to the requirements of the Resource
Conservation and Recovery Act (RCRA), as amended;
(42) "Land disposal" includes but is not limited to any placement of hazardous waste in
a landfill, surface impoundment, waste pile, injection well, land treatment facility,
salt dome formation, salt bed formation, or underground mine or cave;
(43) "Key personnel" means an officer, partner, director, manager, or shareholder of five
percent (5%) or more of stock or financial interest in a corporation, partnership, or
association or parent, subsidiary, or affiliate corporation and its officers, directors,
or shareholders of five percent (5%) or more of stock or financial interest;
(44) "Universal collection" means a municipal solid waste collection system which is
Page 9 of 13
XXXX 2/3/2026 9:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1097
established by ordinance and approved by the cabinet and requires access for each
household or solid waste generator in a county. A commercial or industrial entity
which transports or contracts for the transport of the municipal solid waste it
generates or which operates a solid waste management facility for its exclusive use
may be excluded from participation;
(45) "Governing body" means a county, a waste management district, an entity created
pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act, a taxing district created pursuant to the
provisions of KRS 65.180 to 65.192, a special district created pursuant to the
provisions of KRS 65.160 to 65.176, or counties acting under contract pursuant to
KRS 109.082;
(46) "Convenience center" means a facility that is manned during operating hours for the
collection and subsequent transportation of municipal solid wastes;
(47) "Transfer facility" means any transportation related facility including loading
docks, parking areas, and other similar areas where shipments of solid waste are
held or transferred during the normal course of transportation;
(48) "Collection box" means an unmanned receptacle utilized to collect municipal solid
waste;
(49) "Newsprint" means that class or kind of paper chiefly used for printing newspapers
and weighing more than twenty-four and one-half (24 1/2) pounds, but less than
thirty-five (35) pounds for five hundred (500) sheets of paper two (2) feet by three
(3) feet in size, on rolls that are not less than thirteen (13) inches wide and twenty-
eight (28) inches in diameter and having a brightness of less than sixty (60);
(50) "Postconsumer waste paper" means discarded paper after it has served its intended
use by a publisher;
(51) "Publisher" means a person engaged in the business of publishing newspapers,
advertisement flyers, telephone books, and other printed material;
(52) "Recycled content" means the proportion of fiber in newsprint that is derived from
Page 10 of 13
XXXX 2/3/2026 9:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1097
postconsumer waste paper;
(53) "Tire-derived fuel" or "TDF" means a product made from waste tires to the exact
specifications of a system designed to accept tire-derived fuel as a primary or
supplemental fuel source, that have been reduced to particle sizes not greater than
two (2) inches by two (2) inches and that is destined for transportation from the
waste tire processor for use as a fuel. "Tire-derived fuel" shall not mean refuse-
derived fuel;
(54) "Industrial energy facility" means a facility that produces transportation fuels,
synthetic natural gas, chemicals, or electricity through a gasification process using
coal, coal waste, or biomass resources, and costing in excess of seven hundred fifty
million dollars ($750,000,000) at the time of construction;
(55) "Advanced recycling" means a manufacturing process for the conversion of post-
use polymers and recovered feedstocks into basic hydrocarbon raw materials,
feedstocks, chemicals, and other products through processes that include pyrolysis,
gasification, depolymerization, catalytic cracking, reforming, hydrogenation,
solvolysis, and other similar technologies. "Advanced recycling" does not include
energy recovery or the conversion of post-use polymers into fuel substitutes for use
in energy production;
(56) "Advanced recycling facility" means a manufacturing facility that receives, stores,
and converts post-use polymers and recovered feedstocks it receives using
advanced recycling;
(57) "Depolymerization" means a manufacturing process where post-use polymers are
broken into smaller molecules such as monomers and oligomers or raw,
intermediate, or final products, plastics and chemical feedstocks, basic and
unfinished chemicals, waxes, lubricants, coatings, and other basic hydrocarbons;
(58) "Gasification" means a process through which post-use polymers and recovered
feedstocks are heated and converted into a fuel and gas mixture in an oxygen-
Page 11 of 13
XXXX 2/3/2026 9:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1097
deficient atmosphere, and then converted into raw, intermediate, and final products;
(59) "Post-use polymer" means a plastic polymer that:
(a) Is derived from any industrial, commercial, agricultural, or domestic
activities;
(b) Is not mixed with solid waste or hazardous waste on-site or during processing
at the advanced recycling facility;
(c) Has a use or intended use as a feedstock for the manufacturing of other
feedstocks, raw materials, intermediate products, or final products using
advanced recycling;
(d) Has been sorted from solid waste and other regulated waste, but may contain
residual amounts of solid waste and incidental contaminants or impurities; and
(e) Is processed at an advanced recycling facility or held at such facility prior to
processing;
(60) "Pyrolysis" means a manufacturing process through which post-use polymers are
heated in the absence of oxygen until melted and thermally decomposed, and are
then cooled, condensed, and converted into raw materials, intermediate products, or
final products;
(61) (a) "Recovered feedstock" means one (1) or more of the following materials that
has been processed so that it may be used as feedstock in an advanced
recycling facility:
1. Post-use polymers; and
2. Materials for which the United States Environmental Protection Agency
has made a nonwaste determination pursuant to applicable federal
requirements or has otherwise determined are feedstocks and not solid
waste.
(b) "Recovered feedstock" does not include:
1. Unprocessed municipal solid waste; or
Page 12 of 13
XXXX 2/3/2026 9:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1097
2. Material that is mixed with solid waste or hazardous waste on-site or
during processing at an advanced recycling facility; and
(62) "Solvolysis" means a manufacturing process through which post-use polymers are
purified with the aid of solvents while heated at low temperatures or pressurized to
make raw materials, intermediate products, or final products, while allowing
additives and contaminants to be removed. "Solvolysis" includes but is not limited
to hydrolysis, aminolysis, ammonolysis, methanolysis, and glycolysis[; and
(63) "Wellhead protection area" means and includes all wellhead protection areas as
defined in 42 U.S.C. sec. 300h-7(e) and as determined by the cabinet pursuant to its
obligations under 42 U.S.C. sec. 300h-7(a)].
Page 13 of 13
XXXX 2/3/2026 9:21 AM Jacketed